Washington statutes.
RCW 11.11.903

Effective dates—1998 c 292.

(1) Sections 101 through 116 and 118 of this act take effect July 1, 1999.

(2) Sections 117, 201 through 205, 301, 401, 501 through 507, and 604 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect immediately [April 2, 1998].

[ 1998 c 292 s 603.]